Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2285.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; Fort Defiance; streetlights The sum of $3,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the Fort Defiance chapter of the Navajo Nation to install solar streetlights on BIA Routes N110, N7 and N12 in Fort Defiance.